Arkansas, session 2025, HB1822.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Overtime but not
Overtaxed Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-317. Overtime.
(a) As used in this section, "overtime" means time worked in a
workweek that:
(1) Exceeds forty (40) hours for the workweek; and
(2) Is required to be compensated under the Fair Labor Standards
Act of 1938, 29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(b) Compensation for overtime is exempt from the income tax levied
under this chapter.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.

*JLL327*
03/18/2025 9:14:44 AM JLL327